Hawaii statutes.
§329-23 Republishing and distribution of
schedules. (a) The department of public safety shall make available to
the public on the department's website the schedules annually or more often, as
may be necessary to update the schedules.

(b) The department of public safety shall
publicly announce and, in addition, shall make available to the public copies
of any changes to the schedules as such changes are made. [L 1972, c 10, pt of
§1; am L 1979, c 194, §4; am L 1990, c 281, §10; am L 2016, c 218, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next